Massachusetts, session 194th, H4887.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 53 of chapter 44 of the General Laws or any other
general or special law to the contrary, the town of Plymouth may establish in the town treasury a
special revenue account to be known as the Land Acquisition Fund and may appropriate monies
from the fund to acquire interests in land for the purposes of recreation, open space and other
municipal purposes. Amounts received by the town pursuant to section 7 of chapter 61 of the
General Laws, section 13 of chapter 61A of the General Laws and section 8 of Chapter 61B of
the General Laws shall be deposited into the Land Acquisition Fund. Interest earned shall remain
with and become part of the Land Acquisition Fund.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1